North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55D. Filings, Names, and Registered Agents for Corporations, Nonprofit Corporations, and Partnerships.
Article 3. Names.

§ 55D-20.
Name requirements.

In addition to the requirements of any other applicable section of the General Statutes:

The name of a corporation must contain the word “corporation”, “incorporated”, “company”, or “limited”, or the abbreviation “corp.”, “inc.”, “co.”, or “ltd.”.

The name of a limited liability company must contain the words “limited liability company” or the abbreviation “L.L.C.” or “LLC”, or the combination “ltd. liability co.”, “limited liability co.”, or “ltd. liability company”. Notwithstanding the prior sentence, any limited liability company whose name contained the words “low-profit limited liability company” or the abbreviation “L3C” pursuant to subdivision (6) of this subsection prior to its repeal on January 1, 2014, may continue to use that name unless the limited liability company amends its articles of organization to change its name.

The name of a limited partnership that is not a limited liability limited partnership must contain the words “limited partnership”, the abbreviation “L.P.” or “LP”, or the combination “ltd. partnership”.

The name of a limited liability limited partnership must contain the words “registered limited liability limited partnership” or “limited liability limited partnership” or the abbreviation “L.L.L.P.”, “R.L.L.L.P.”, “LLLP”, or “RLLLP”.

A registered limited liability partnership’s name must contain the words “registered limited liability partnership” or “limited liability partnership” or the abbreviation “L.L.P.”, “R.L.L.P.”, “LLP” or “RLLP”.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-157, s. 11, effective January 1, 2014.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, the name of a limited partnership shall not contain the name of a limited partner unless (i) it is also the name of a general partner or the corporate name of a corporate general partner, or (ii) the business of the limited partnership has been carried on under that name before the admission of that limited partner.

The name of a corporation, nonprofit corporation, or limited liability company shall not contain language stating or implying that the entity is organized for a purpose other than that permitted by

G.S. 55-3-01

, 55A-3-01, or 57D-2-01 and by its articles of incorporation or organization.

The use of assumed business names or fictitious names, as provided for in Chapter 66 of the General Statutes, is not affected by this Chapter or by Chapter 55, 55A, 57D, or 59 of the General Statutes.

The filing of any document, the reservation or registration of any name under this Chapter or under Chapter 55, 55A, 55B, 57D, or 59 of the General Statutes, or the issuance of a certificate of authority to transact business or conduct affairs or a statement of foreign registration does not authorize the use in this State of a name in violation of the rights of any third party under the federal trademark act, the trademark act of this State, or other statutory or common law, and is not a defense to an action for violation of any of those rights.

History.

1901, c. 2, s. 8; 1903, c. 453; Rev., s. 1137; 1913, c. 5, s. 1; C.S., s. 1114; 1935, cc. 166, 320; 1939, c. 222; G.S., s. 55-2; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 28; 1969, c. 751, ss. 4-6; 1973, c. 469, s. 45.3; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 12.5; 1995, c. 539, ss. 4, 5; 2001-358, ss. 14(a), 15; 2001-387, ss. 162, 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6; 2010-187, s. 3; 2013-157, s. 11; 2016-100, s. 5.

Official Comment to Former G.S. 55-4-01

Editor’s Note.
— The Official Comments below were formerly located under G.S. 55-4-01 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the Official Comments have been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

All of chapter 4, relating to corporate names, has been reviewed and revised in light of the responsibilities that should reasonably be placed on secretaries of state considering their available resources.

Section 4.01 deals with two basic name requirements: (1) the name must indicate “corporateness,” and (2) the name must be distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state.

Indication of corporateness

Names that are “distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state”

Classes of unavailable names

Consent to use

Section 4.01(a) permits the words indicating corporateness to include “corporation,” “incorporated,” “limited,” or “company” or an abbreviation of them. While the words “company” and “limited” are commonly used by partnerships or limited partnerships, and therefore do not uniquely indicate corporateness, their use is widespread and is continued since it creates no discernible harm. The Act also permits the use of words or abbreviations in another language that import corporateness.

The revision of the Model Act is based on the fundamental premise that its name provisions should only ensure that each corporation has a sufficiently distinctive name so that it may be distinguished from other corporations upon the records of the secretary of state. The general business corporation statute should not be a partial substitute for a general assumed name, unfair competition, or antifraud statute. As a result, the Model Act does not restrict the power of a corporation to adopt or use an assumed or fictitious name with the same freedom as an individual or impose a requirement that an “official” name not be “deceptively similar” to another corporate name (a requirement of earlier versions of the Model Act). Principles of unfair competition, not the business corporation act, provide the limits on the competitive use of similar names.

The phrase “distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state” is drawn from section 102(a)(1) of the Delaware General Corporation Law. The principal justifications for requiring a distinguishable official name are (1) to prevent confusion within the secretary of state’s office and the tax office and (2) to permit accuracy in naming and serving corporate defendants in litigation. Thus, confusion in an absolute or linguistic sense is the appropriate test under the Model Act, not the competitive relationship between the corporations, which is the test for fraud or unfair competition. The precise scope of “distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state” is an appropriate subject of regulation by the office of secretary of state in order to ensure uniformity of administration. Corporate names that differ only in the words used to indicate corporateness are generally not distinguishable. Thus, if ABC Corporation is in existence, the names “ABC Inc.,” “ABC Co.,” or “ABC Corp.” should not be viewed as distinguishable. Similarly, minor variations between names that are unlikely to be noticed, such as the substitution of a “.” for a “,” or the substitution of an arabic numeral for a word, such as “2” for “Two”, or the substitution of a lower case letter for a capital, such as “d” for “D,” generally should not be viewed as being distinguishable.

The elimination of the “deceptively similar” requirement that appeared in earlier versions of the Model Act and the specific recognition appearing in section 4.01(e), that corporations may use artificial or fictitious names to the same extent an individual can, are based on the fact that the secretary of state does not generally police the unfair competitive use of names and, indeed, usually has no resources to do so. For example, assume that “ABC Corporation” operates a retail furniture store in Albany, New York, and another group wants to use the same name to engage in a business involving imports of textiles in New York City. An attempt to incorporate a second “ABC Corporation” (or a very close variant such as “ABC Corp.” or “ABC Inc.”) should be rejected because the names are not distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state. If the second group uses a distinguishable official name, like “AB
D
Corporation,” it probably may lawfully assume the fictitious name “ABC Corporation” to import goods in New York City if it files the assumed name certificate required by New York law. In these situations, the secretary of state will usually not know in what business or in what geographical area “ABC Corporation” is active or what name AB

D

Corporation is actually using in its business; he simply maintains an alphabetical list of “official” corporate names as they appear from corporate records and makes his decision about whether a proposed name is distinguishable from other “official names” by comparing the proposed name with those on the list. This assumes that there is either no assumed name statute or that if there is such a statute it requires only local filing in counties or, as in New York, a central filing which does not become part of the corporate records maintained by the secretary of state’s office. These assumptions are generally if not universally correct.

Section 4.01(b)(3) lists classes of “official names” that are not available. Names in use and thus unavailable from the standpoint of the secretary of state’s uniqueness test for “official names” come from the following sources: (1) official names of profit or not-for-profit domestic corporations, (2) official names of foreign profit or not-for-profit corporations qualified to transact business, (3) reserved names, and (4) registered names. The secretary of state becomes involved with fictitious or assumed names only in the situation where a foreign corporation, planning to transact business in a state, discovers that its name is not available in that state. To qualify it must adopt an assumed or fictitious name as its “official name” in the state, see section 15.06. Such a fictitious or assumed name is thereafter an “official” name and is unavailable to the same extent as any other “official name” in use is unavailable.

Section 4.01(c)(1) authorizes the secretary of state to accept a name that is indistinguishable from the name of another corporation if that corporation files an undertaking in a form satisfactory to the secretary of state that it will thereafter change its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state. This privilege may be important in acquisition transactions where a new corporation is to take over the business of an existing corporation without a change in corporate name. The secretary of state may require the undertaking to specify the new name which the corporation will adopt and the time period within which the change will be made. The requirements imposed on the undertaking should be consistent with the limited role of the secretary of state in the administration of section 4.01.

Former Amended North Carolina Commentary to G.S. 55-4-01

Editor’s Note.
— The North Carolina Commentary below was formerly located under G.S. 55-1-23 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the North Carolina Commentary has been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

Unlike the Model Act, former G.S. 55-12(a) did not permit a corporate name to contain “words or abbreviations of like import in another language.” The drafters concluded that a corporate name should not contain foreign words or abbreviations to indicate corporateness and that it would be confusing to the Secretary of State’s office to determine what foreign words or abbreviations are “of like import.” Therefore, consistent with the provisions of the prior law, they omitted the Model Act language “or words or abbreviations of like import in another language” from subdivision (a)(1).

The Model Act was modified in subsection (c) to clarify that any person (not just a corporation) may apply for authorization under this subsection.

Subsection 4.01(d) of the Model Act is a restatement of the trade name law and therefore was deemed unnecessary.

Subsection (e) was rewritten for clarification.

Subsection (f) was added to bring forward the provisions of former G.S. 55-12(k).

Subsection (g), which is not in the Model Act, is an entirely new section that addresses the use of a dissolved corporation’s name.

Former G.S. 55-12(b), which provided that a corporate name could not contain “any word or phrase which is likely to mislead the public or which indicates or implies that it is organized for any purpose other than one or more of the purposes contained in its charter,” was not brought forward. The provision was aimed at preventing fraudulent business practices, and the drafters decided that this should be policed by the Attorney General rather than by the Secretary of State through the corporation laws.

§ 55D-21.
Entity names on the records of the Secretary of State; availability.

The following entities are subject to this section:

Domestic corporations, nonprofit corporations, limited liability companies, limited partnerships, and registered limited liability partnerships.

Foreign corporations, foreign nonprofit corporations, foreign limited liability companies, and foreign limited partnerships applying for or maintaining a certificate of authority to transact business or conduct affairs in this State.

Foreign limited liability partnerships applying for or maintaining a statement of foreign registration.

Except as authorized by subsection (c) of this section, the name of an entity subject to this section, including a fictitious name for a foreign entity, must be distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from:

The name of a domestic corporation, nonprofit corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, or registered limited liability partnership, or of a foreign corporation, foreign nonprofit corporation, foreign limited liability company, or foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this State, or a foreign limited liability partnership maintaining a statement of foreign registration in this State;

A name reserved or registered under

G.S. 55D-23

or registered under

G.S. 55D-24

; and

The fictitious name adopted by a foreign corporation, foreign nonprofit corporation, foreign limited liability company, or foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business or conduct affairs, or a foreign limited liability partnership maintaining a statement of foreign registration in this State because its real name is unavailable.

A person may apply to the Secretary of State for authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable upon the Secretary of State’s records from one or more of the names described in subsection (b) of this section. The Secretary of State shall authorize use of the name applied for if:

The other person who has or uses the name or who has reserved or registered the name consents in writing to the use and submits an undertaking in form satisfactory to the Secretary of State to change its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from the name of the applicant; or

The applicant delivers to the Secretary of State a certified copy of the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant’s right to use the name applied for in this State.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the name of a corporation dissolved under Article 14 of Chapter 55 of the General Statutes, of a nonprofit corporation dissolved under Article 14 of Chapter 55A of the General Statutes, of a limited liability company dissolved under Article 6 of Chapter 57D of the General Statutes, of a limited partnership dissolved under Part 8 of Article 5 of Chapter 59 of the General Statutes, or of a limited liability partnership whose registration as a limited liability partnership has been cancelled under

G.S. 59-84.2

or revoked under

G.S. 59-84.4

, may not be used by another entity until one of the following occurs:

In the case of a nonjudicial dissolution other than an administrative dissolution or cancellation of registration as a limited liability partnership, 120 days after the effective date of the dissolution or cancellation.

In the case of an administrative dissolution or revocation of registration as a limited liability partnership, the expiration of five years after the effective date of the administrative dissolution or revocation.

In the case of a judicial dissolution, 120 days after the later of the date the judgment has become final or the effective date of the dissolution. The person applying for the name must certify to the Secretary of State that no appeal or other judicial review of the judgment directing dissolution is pending.

The dissolved entity changes its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from the names of other domestic corporations, nonprofit corporations, limited liability companies, limited partnerships, or registered limited liability partnerships or foreign corporations, foreign nonprofit corporations, foreign limited liability companies, or foreign limited partnerships authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this State, or foreign limited liability partnerships maintaining a statement of foreign registration in this State.

History.

1901, c. 2, s. 8; 1903, c. 453; Rev., s. 1137; 1913, c. 5, s. 1; C.S., s. 1114; 1935, cc. 166, 320; 1939, c. 222; G.S., s. 55-2; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 28; 1969, c. 751, ss. 4-6; 1973, c. 469, s. 45.3; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 12.5; 1995, c. 539, ss. 4, 5; 2001-358, ss. 14(a), 15; 2001-387, ss. 163, 173, 175(a); 2001-390, s. 15; 2001-413, s. 6; 2001-487, s. 62(h); 2002-159, s. 23; 2013-157, s. 12.

Former Official Comment to G.S. 55-4-01

Editor’s Note.
— The Official Comments located under

G.S. 55D-20

were formerly located under G.S. 55-4-01, parts of which were recodified as

G.S. 55D-20

and G.S.
55D-21 in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the Official Comments have been transferred to G.S. 55D-20 as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52. The Official Comments under that section apply to this section as well.

Former Amended North Carolina Commentary to
G.S. 55-4-01

Editor’s Note.
— The North Carolina Commentary located under

G.S. 55D-20

was formerly located under G.S. 55-4-01, parts of which were recodified as

G.S. 55D-20

and

G.S. 55D-21

in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the North Carolina Commentary has been transferred to G.S. 55D-20 as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52. The North Carolina Commentary under that section applies to this section as well.

§ 55D-22.
Names of foreign entities.

If the name of a foreign corporation, foreign nonprofit corporation, foreign limited liability company, foreign limited partnership, or foreign limited liability partnership does not satisfy the requirements of

G.S. 55D-20

and

G.S. 55D-21

, then to obtain or maintain a certificate of authority to transact business or conduct affairs in this State or a statement of foreign registration in this State, the entity may:

If a foreign corporation or foreign nonprofit corporation, add the word “corporation”, “incorporated”, “company”, or “limited”, or the abbreviation “corp.”, “inc.”, “co.”, or “ltd.” to its corporate name for use in this State;

If a foreign limited liability company, add the words “limited liability company”, or the abbreviation “L.L.C.”, or “LLC”, or the combination “ltd. liability co.”, “limited liability co.”, or “ltd. liability company” to its name for use in this State if the addition will cause the name to satisfy the requirements of

G.S. 55D-20

and

G.S. 55D-21

;

If a foreign limited partnership that is not a foreign limited liability limited partnership, add the words “limited partnership” or the abbreviation “L.P.” or “LP”, or the combination “ltd. partnership”;

If a foreign limited partnership that is a foreign limited liability limited partnership, add the words “registered limited liability limited partnership” or “limited liability limited partnership” or the abbreviation “L.L.L.P.”, “R.L.L.L.P.”, “LLLP”, or “RLLLP”;

If a foreign limited liability partnership, add the words “registered limited liability partnership”, or “limited liability partnership” or the abbreviation “L.L.P.”, “R.L.L.P.”, “LLP”, or “RLLP”; or

Use a fictitious name, which includes one or more of the words, abbreviations, or combinations in subdivisions (1) through (5) of this subsection if applicable, to transact business or conduct affairs in this State if its real name is unavailable and it delivers to the Secretary of State for filing a copy of the resolution adopting the fictitious name.

If a foreign corporation, foreign nonprofit corporation, foreign limited liability company, or foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this State, or a foreign limited liability partnership maintaining a statement of foreign registration, changes its name to one that does not satisfy the requirements of this Article, it may not transact business or conduct affairs in this State under the changed name until it adopts a name satisfying the requirements of this Article and obtains an amended certificate of authority or statement of foreign registration under

G.S. 55-15-04

, 55A-15-04, 57D-7-04, 59-91, or 59-905, as applicable.

History.

2001-358, s. 15; 2001-387, ss. 164, 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6; 2013-157, s. 13.

§ 55D-23.
Reserved name.

A person may reserve the exclusive use of a name for an entity, including a fictitious name for a foreign corporation, foreign nonprofit corporation, foreign limited liability company, foreign limited partnership, or foreign limited liability partnership whose name is not available, by filing an application with the Secretary of State. The application must set forth the name and address of the applicant and the name proposed to be reserved. If the Secretary of State finds that the name applied for is available, the Secretary of State shall reserve the name for the applicant’s exclusive use for a nonrenewable 120-day period.

The owner of a reserved name may transfer the reservation to another person by filing with the Secretary of State a signed notice of the transfer that states the name and address of the transferee.

Any person acquiring the goodwill of a domestic corporation, nonprofit corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, or registered limited liability partnership, or of a foreign corporation, foreign nonprofit corporation, foreign limited liability company, or foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this State, or of a foreign limited liability partnership maintaining a statement of foreign registration in this State may, on furnishing the Secretary of State satisfactory evidence of such acquisition, reserve for 10 years the exclusive right to any name that became available as a result of the acquisition.

History.

1901, c. 2, s. 8; 1903, c. 453; Rev., s. 1137; 1913, c. 5, s. 1; C.S., s. 1114; 1935, cc. 166, 320; 1939, c. 222; G.S., s. 55-2; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 28; 1969, c. 751, ss. 4-6; 1973, c. 469, s. 45.3; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2001-358, ss. 14(b), 15; 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

Official Comment to Former G.S. 55-4-02

Editor’s Note.
— The Official Comments below were formerly located under G.S. 55-4-02 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the Official Comments have been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

The “reservation” of a corporate name is basically a device to simplify the formation of a new corporation or the qualification of a foreign corporation. By reserving a name, the persons considering the formation or qualification of the corporation can order stationery, prepare documents, etc. on the assumption that the reserved name will be available. Reference to a specific intent to form a new corporation is not required by the statute, however, since a secretary of state is not equipped and should not be asked to determine whether the requisite intent actually exists. For the same reason, “any person” is permitted to reserve a corporate name without reference to specific classes of persons who might wish to reserve a corporate name for various purposes.

Under section 4.02 of the Model Act, an available corporate name may be reserved:

by persons considering the formation of a new domestic corporation;

by persons considering the formation of a corporation in another state and the immediate qualification of that new corporation in this state; and

by a foreign corporation planning or considering qualification in this state. The name reserved may be the foreign corporation’s “official name” (if that name is available) or another name. The foreign corporation may thereafter use the reserved name as the name of a domestic subsidiary or, if its real name is unavailable, as a fictitious “official name” for its qualification under section 15.06.

These illustrations are designed to suggest the scope and flexibility of section 4.02, and not to exhaust the possible uses to which a reserved name may be put.

(2) by persons considering the formation of a corporation in another state and the immediate qualification of that new corporation in this state; and

(3) by a foreign corporation planning or considering qualification in this state. The name reserved may be the foreign corporation’s “official name” (if that name is available) or another name. The foreign corporation may thereafter use the reserved name as the name of a domestic subsidiary or, if its real name is unavailable, as a fictitious “official name” for its qualification under section 15.06.

These illustrations are designed to suggest the scope and flexibility of section 4.02, and not to exhaust the possible uses to which a reserved name may be put.

Consideration was also given to whether reservation of a corporate name should be made renewable. The modern requirements for incorporation of a domestic corporation or the qualification of a foreign corporation are so simple that it is unlikely that more than 120 days could ever be realistically required to form or qualify a corporation. Also, it was believed to be undesirable to allow the reservation procedure to be used for other purposes, such as permanently setting aside a name by successive renewals. Therefore, only a single, one-time reservation is provided for, although after the 120-day period expires the name becomes available again and anyone, including the original reserver, may reserve the name. And nothing prevents the formation of an inactive corporation specifically to hold the desired name if a longer period of reservation is desired than the 120-day period specified by section 4.02.

North Carolina Commentary to Former G.S. 55-4-02

Editor’s Note.
— The North Carolina Commentary below was formerly located under G.S. 55-4-02 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the North Carolina Commentary has been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

Subsection (c) was added to the Model Act’s provisions to bring forward the provisions of former G.S. 55-12(e). Other minor changes to the Model Act in this section were made for clarification.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2001-358, ss. 14(b) and 15, effective January 1, 2002, and applicable to documents submitted for filing on or after that date, recodified G.S. 55-4-02 as this section; in subsection (a), in the first sentence, substituted “exclusive use of a name for an entity” for “exclusive use of a corporate name” and inserted “foreign nonprofit corporation, foreign limited liability company, foreign limited partnership, or foreign limited liability partnership,” and in the last sentence, deleted “corporate” preceding “name applied,” and substituted “the Secretary of State” for “he”; deleted “corporate” preceding “name may” in subsection (b); and rewrote subsection (c).

§ 55D-24.
Registered name.

A foreign corporation, foreign nonprofit corporation, foreign limited liability company, foreign limited partnership, or foreign limited liability partnership may register its name, or its name with any addition required by

G.S. 55D-22

, if the name to be registered is distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from the names that are not available under G.S. 55D-21(b).

An entity described in subsection (a) of this section registers its name, or its name with any addition required by

G.S. 55D-22

, by filing with the Secretary of State an application:

Setting forth its name, or its name with any addition required by

G.S. 55D-22

, the state or country and date of its incorporation or formation, and a brief description of the nature of the business or activities in which it is engaged; and

Accompanied by a certificate of existence (or a document of a similar import) from the state or country of incorporation or formation.

The name is registered for the applicant’s exclusive use upon the effective date of the application and until the end of the calendar year in which it became effective.

An entity whose registration is effective may renew it for successive years by filing with the Secretary of State a renewal application, which complies with the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, between October 1 and December 31 of the preceding year. The renewal application renews the registration for the following calendar year. Any renewal application filed after the expiration of the registration shall be treated as a new application for registration.

An entity whose registration is effective may thereafter become authorized to transact business or conduct affairs under that name or consent in writing to the use of that name by:

A domestic corporation, nonprofit corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, or registered limited liability partnership thereafter incorporated, formed, or registered in this State under that name;

A domestic corporation, nonprofit corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, or registered limited liability partnership that changes its name to that name; or

Another foreign corporation, foreign nonprofit corporation, foreign limited liability company, foreign limited partnership, or foreign limited liability partnership that becomes authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this State under that name.The registration terminates when the domestic corporation, nonprofit corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, or registered limited liability partnership is incorporated, formed, registered, or changes its name or the foreign corporation, foreign nonprofit corporation, foreign limited liability company, foreign limited partnership, or foreign limited liability partnership qualifies or registers or consents to the qualification or registration of another entity under the registered name.

History.

1901, c. 2, s. 8; 1903, c. 453; Rev., s. 1137; 1913, c. 5, s. 1; C.S., s. 1114; 1935, cc. 166, 320; 1939, c. 222; G.S., s. 55-2; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 28; 1969, c. 751, ss. 4-6; 1973, c. 469, s. 45.3; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2001-358, ss. 14(b), 15; 2001-387, ss. 165(a), 165(b), 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

Official Comment to Former G.S. 55-4-03

Editor’s Note.
— The Official Comments below were formerly located under G.S. 55-4-03 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the Official Comments have been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

The “registration” of a corporate name is basically a device by which a foreign corporation, not qualified to transact business in the state, can preserve the right to use its unique “real” name if it decides later to qualify in the state. In effect, registration ensures “real” name availability in areas of potential future expansion.

It is believed desirable to limit section 4.03 to this purpose and not allow it to become an indirect device for the preservation of trademarks, trade names, or possible assumed names. For this reason, generally only “real” names of foreign corporations may be registered (with exceptions described below). A broader approach would create issues better resolved under a trademark or similar statute, or by litigation under unfair competition principles, and might impose duties on secretaries of state that they are generally not equipped to handle, or could handle only at increased cost.

Registration of a name other than the “real” name is permitted in only one situation: if the “real” name of a foreign corporation is not available solely because it does not comply with section 15.06, requiring the words “incorporated,” “corporation,” “company,” or “limited,” or an abbreviation of one of these words, the corporation may add one of these words or abbreviations and register its “real” name as so modified under section 4.03(a).

Confusion sometimes exists between “reservation” of names under section 4.02 and registration of names under section 4.03. A foreign corporation that is planning to qualify as a foreign corporation and finds that its name is available in the state may either register or reserve the name. Often a foreign corporation will have to decide whether to qualify or to create a domestic subsidiary; this well may be decided after the exclusive right to use the corporate name in the state is obtained either by reservation or by registration. If the corporation registers its name, it will be kept indefinitely; if it reserves, it will be kept for 120 days and then become available again. That is the foreign corporation’s choice. If a foreign corporation registers its name and then elects to form a domestic or foreign subsidiary, the written consent procedure of section 4.03(e) allows the secretary of state to ascertain that the domestic subsidiary is related to the foreign corporation and that use of the registered name by that subsidiary is acceptable to the foreign parent.

If a foreign corporation’s “real” name is unavailable, a foreign corporation may
reserve
any name — including one that is assumed or fictitious when compared with the corporation’s “real” name — for 120 days. But it may not

register

this type of name in light
of the policy against allowing the name provisions of the Model Act to be used for purposes broader than the “unique name” issue. Nevertheless, a foreign corporation that wishes to be certain that a particular fictitious or assumed name will be available in the future may create an inactive domestic subsidiary with the desired name to preserve its future availability. See also the Official Comment to section 15.06.

Section 4.03(e) provides that the protection of the name provided by this section terminates when the name is used pursuant to this section by the foreign corporation or its domestic or foreign subsidiary.

North Carolina Commentary to Former G.S. 55-4-03

Editor’s Note.
— The North Carolina Commentary below was formerly located under G.S. 55-4-03 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the North Carolina Commentary has been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

Subsection (c) differs from the Model Act in providing that registration of a corporate name remains effective “until the end of the calendar year in which it became effective.”

The last sentence of subsection (d) was added from former G.S. 55-12(h). Former G.S. 55-12(h) permitted renewals on a year-to-year basis for ten years, whereas this Act does not contain this limitation.

Other minor changes to the Model Act in this section were made for clarification.

§ 55D-25.
Reserved and registered names; powers of the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State may revoke any reservation or registration of a name if the Secretary of State:

Gives written notice by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the person who made the reservation or registration of the date and time of a hearing;

Conducts a hearing not less that 15 days after receipt of the notice as shown by the return receipt; and

Finds that the application therefor or any transfer thereof was not made in good faith or that any statement contained in the application for reservation or registration was false when such application was filed or has thereafter become false.

History.

1901, c. 2, s. 8; 1903, c. 453; Rev., s. 1137; 1913, c. 5, s. 1; C.S., s. 1114; 1935, cc. 166, 320; 1939, c. 222; G.S., s. 55-2; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 28; 1969, c. 751, ss. 4-6; 1973, c. 469, s. 45.3; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1993, c. 552, s. 7; 2001-358, ss. 14(b), 15; 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

North Carolina Commentary to Former G.S. 55-4-04

Editor’s Note.
— The North Carolina Commentary below was formerly located under G.S. 55-4-04 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the North Carolina Commentary has been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

This section, which is not part of the Model Act, was added to bring forward the provisions of former G.S. 55-12(i), relating to the power of the Secretary of State to revoke any reservation or registration of a corporate name, and the provisions of former G.S. 55-12(j), relating to enjoining the use by a corporation of a name in violation of Article 4. The drafters concluded that such powers should be explicit.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2001-358, ss. 14(b) and 15, effective January 1, 2002, and applicable to documents submitted for filing on or after that date, recodified G.S. 55-4-04 as this section; and rewrote the section.